Hawaii statutes.
[§269-26.6] Preferential water
carrier service rates for agricultural activities. The public utilities
commission may authorize preferential water carrier service rates by tariff for
ratepayers that engage in agricultural activities. The application process for
obtaining preferential water carrier service rates by tariff may be established
by the public utilities commission. [L 2012, c 232, §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next